Maine, session 132, LD1368.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §662 is enacted to read:
§662. Access for shellfish harvesting
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Intertidal zone" has the same meaning as in Title 12, section 6001, subsection 21.
B. "Shellfish" has the same meaning as in Title 12, section 6001, subsection 41.
2. Property owners of land adjacent to intertidal zone. The estate of an owner of
property adjacent to the intertidal zone that allows access to the intertidal zone through the
property for a person to harvest shellfish in the intertidal zone is exempt from taxation in
an amount of just value equal to a reduction in $500 of taxes due under this Part based upon
the local assessed value of the property.
3. Application with assessor. A person who desires to secure exemption under this
section shall make written application and file written proof of entitlement on or before the
first day of April, in the year in which the exemption is first requested, with the assessor of
the place in which the property is located. The assessor may require a copy of a plan that
describes the allowed spatial and temporal use of, including any limitations on, the access
to the intertidal zone. Notwithstanding Title 1, chapter 13, an application and proof of
entitlement filed pursuant to this subsection is confidential and may not be made available
for public inspection. The application and proof of entitlement must be made available to
the State Tax Assessor upon request. The assessor of the place in which the property is
located shall thereafter grant the exemption to a person who is so qualified until the person
notifies the assessor of reason or desire for discontinuance of the exemption.
Sec. 2. Application. This Act applies to property tax years beginning on or after
April 1, 2026.